Hawaii statutes.
§189-14 Rights of entry, penalties.
The department may board any vessel, whether commercial or non-commercial,
capable of being used in taking marine life, or enter any place of business
where marine life is sold, stored, processed, cooked, canned, or cured, for
purposes of investigation and inspection, and inspect any and all books and
records containing account of the marine life taken, bought, or sold.

Any person who fails to permit an inspection as
provided in this section, or who refuses to produce any book or record
containing any information of the marine life taken, bought, or sold, and any
person who interferes with any officer or agent of the department in the
performance of the officer's or agent's duty as authorized in this section,
shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and punished as provided by section
189-4. [L 1929, c 235, §§1, 2; RL 1935, §338; RL 1945, §1268; RL 1955, §21-126;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §189-14; am L 1981, c 85,
§87; gen ch 1985; am L 1999, c 195, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next